Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.071

Comprehensive plan—Forwarding to legislative body.

Upon completion of the hearing or hearings on the comprehensive plan or successive parts thereof, the planning agency, after making such changes as it deems necessary following such hearing, shall transmit a copy of its recommendations for the comprehensive plan, or successive parts thereof, to the legislative body through the chief administrative officer, who shall acknowledge receipt thereof and direct the clerk to certify thereon the date of receipt.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.071.]